The depth of a fall is always measured by the difference between the 
level of the original position from which a body has fallen and that in which it 
now lies. 


The same holds good for nations and States. The matter of greatest 
importance here is the height of the original level, or rather the greatest height 
that had been attained before the descent began. 


Therefore, the original position is of paramount importance, and only the 
fall or collapse of that which is capable of rising above the general level, can 
impress the beholder. 


The collapse of the Second Reich was all the more bewildering for those 
who could ponder over it and feel the effect of it in their hearts, because the, 
Reich had fallen from a height which can hardly be imagined in these days of 
misery and humiliation. 


The Second Reich was founded in circumstances of such dazzling 
splendour that the whole nation had become entranced and exalted by it. 
Following an unparalleled series of victories, that Reich was handed over as 
the guerdon of immortal heroism to the children and grandchildren of the 
heroes. 


Whether they were fully conscious of it or not, does not matter, the 
Germans felt that this Reich, which did not owe its existence to the 
machinations of parliamentary factions, was superior to the great majority of 
States by reason of the nobler circumstances that had accompanied its 
establishment. 


When its foundations were laid, the accompanying music was not the 
chatter of parliamentary debates, but the thunder and clash of war along the 
battle-front that encircled Paris. 


It was thus that an act of statesmanship was accomplished whereby the 
Germans, princes as well as people, established the future Reich and restored 
the symbol of the Imperial Crown. Bismarck’s State was not founded on 


252 


treason and assassination by deserters and shirkers, but by the regiments that 
had fought at, the front. 


This unique birth and baptism of fire sufficed of themselves to surround 
the Second Reich with an aureole of historical splendour such as few of the 
older States could claim. 


What a period of prosperity then began! A position of independence in 
regard to the outside world guaranteed the means of livelihood at home. The 
nation increased in numbers and in worldly wealth. 


The honour of the State and thereby the honour of the people as a whole 
were secured and protected by an Army which was the most striking proof of 
the difference between this new Reich and the old German Confederation. 


The downfall of the Second Reich and the German nation has been so 
profound that everyone seems to have been dumbfounded and rendered 
incapable of feeling the significance of this downfall or reflecting on it. 


It seems as if people were utterly unable to picture in their minds the 
heights to which the Reich formerly attained, so visionary and unreal appears 
the greatness and splendour of those days in contrast to tie misery of the 
present. 


Bearing this in mind, we can understand why and how people become so 
dazed when they try to look back, to the sublime past that they forget to look for 
the symptoms of the great collapse which must certainly have been present in 
some form or other. 


Naturally this applies only to those for whom Germany was more than 
merely a place of abode and a source of livelihood. These are the only people 
who have been able to feel the present conditions as really catastrophic, 
whereas others have considered these conditions as the fulfilment of what they 
had looked forward to and hitherto silently wished. 


The symptoms of future collapse were definitely to be perceived in those 
earlier days, although very few made any attempt to deduce a practical lesson 
from their significance, but this is now a greater necessity than it ever was 
before, for just as bodily ailments can be cured only when their origin has been 
diagnosed, so also political disease can be treated only when it has been 
diagnosed. 


253 


It is obvious, of course, that the external symptoms of any disease can be 
more readily detected than its internal causes, for these symptoms strike the 
eye more readily. 


This is also the reason why so many people recognise only external 
effects and mistake them for causes. Indeed, they will sometimes try to deny the 
existence of such causes, and that is why the majority of people among us 
recognise the German collapse only in the prevailing economic distress and the 
results that have followed therefrom. 


Almost everyone has to bear his share of this burden and that is why 
each one looks on the economic catastrophe as the cause of the present 
deplorable state of affairs. 


The broad masses of the people see little of the cultural, political, and 
moral background of this collapse. Many of them completely lack both the 
necessary feeling and the powers of understanding. 


That the masses of the people should thus estimate the causes of 
Germany’s downfall is quite understandable, but the fact that intelligent 
sections of the community regard the German collapse primarily as an 
economic catastrophe, and consequently think that a cure for it may be found in 
an economic solution, seems to me to be the reason why hitherto no 
improvement has been brought about. 


No improvement can be brought about until it is understood that 
economics play only a secondary role, while the main part is played by 
political, moral, and racial factors. 


Only when this is understood will it be possible to comprehend the 
causes of the present evils and consequently to find the ways and means of 
remedying them. 


Therefore, the question of why Germany really collapsed is one of the 
most urgent significance, especially for a political movement which aims at 
overcoming this disaster. 


In scrutinising the past with a view to discovering the causes of the 
German break-up, it is necessary to be careful lest we may be unduly 
impressed by external results that readily strike the eye and thus ignore the less 
manifest causes of these results. 


254 


The most facile, and therefore the most generally accepted way of 
accounting for the present misfortune, is to say that it is the result of a lost war, 
and that this is the real cause of the present distress. 


Probably there are many who honestly believe in this absurd 
explanation, but there are many more in whose mouths it is a deliberate and 
conscious falsehood. This applies to all those who are now feeding at the 
government troughs, for the prophets of the Revolution again and again 
declared to the people that the result of the war would be immaterial to the 
great masses. 


On the contrary, they solemnly assured the public that it was high finance 
which was principally interested in a victorious outcome of this gigantic 
struggle between the nations, but that the German people and the German 
workers had no interest whatsoever therein. 


Indeed, the apostles of world conciliation habitually asserted that, far 
from any German downfall, the opposite was bound to take place—namely, the 
resurgence of the German people—once ‘militarism’ had been crushed. 


Did not these self-same circles sing the praises of the Entente and did 
they not also lay the whole blame for the sanguinary struggle on Germany? 


Would they have succeeded in doing so, had they not put forward the 
theory that a military defeat would have no political consequences for the 
German people? Was not the whole Revolution dressed up in the pretty phrase 
that, since it would check the victorious advance of the German banners, the 
German people would thus be assured of its liberty both at home and abroad? 
Is not that so, you miserable, lying rascals? 


That kind of impudence which is typical of the Jews was necessary in 
order to proclaim the defeat of the Army as the cause of the German collapse, 
indeed the Berlin Vorwarts, that organ and mouthpiece of sedition, wrote on 
this occasion that the German nation should not be permitted to bring home its 
banners in triumph. Yet our collapse is attributed to the military defeat. 


Of course it would be out of the question to enter into an argument with 
these liars who deny one moment what they said the moment before. I should 
waste no further words on them were it not for the fact that there are many 
thoughtless people who repeat all this parrot-fashion, without being 
necessarily inspired by any evil motives. 


255 


But the observations I am making here are also meant for our fighting 
followers, seeing that nowadays one’s spoken words are often forgotten and 
their meaning distorted. 


The assertion that the loss of the war was the cause of the German 
collapse can best be answered as follows: 


It is admittedly a fact that the loss of the war was of tragic importance 
for the future of our country, but that loss was not in itself a cause. It was rather 
the consequence of other causes. 


That a disastrous ending to this life and death conflict must have 
involved catastrophes in its train was clearly seen by everyone of insight who 
could think in a straightforward manner, but unfortunately there were also 
people whose powers of understanding seemed to fail them at that critical 
moment. 


There were other people who had first questioned that truth and then 
altogether denied it, and there were people who, after their secret desire had 
been fulfilled, were suddenly faced with the state of affairs, that resulted from 
their own collaboration. 


Such people are responsible for the collapse, and not the lost war, 
though they now want to attribute everything to this. As a matter of fact, the 
loss of the war was a result of their activities and not the result of bad 
leadership, as they would now like to maintain. 


Our enemies were not cowards. They also knew how to die. From the 
very first day of the war they outnumbered the German Army, and the arsenals 
and armament factories of the whole world were at their disposal for the 
replenishment of military equipment. 


Indeed, it is universally admitted that the German victories, which had 
been steadily won during four years of warfare against the whole world, were 
(apart, of course, from the heroism of the troops, and the magnificent 
organisation) solely due to the German military leadership. 


That organisation and leadership of the German Army was the most 
mighty thing that the world has ever seen. Any shortcomings which became 
evident were humanly unavoidable. The collapse of that Army was not the 
cause of our present distress. It was itself the consequence of ether faults, but 
this consequence in its turn ushered in a further collapse, which was more 


256 


obvious. 


That such was actually the case can be shown as follows: Must a 
military defeat necessarily lead to such a complete overthrow of the State and 
the nation? 


Whenever has this been the result of an unfortunate, lost war? 
Are nations in fact ever ruined by a lost war and by that alone? 


The answer to this question can be briefly stated by referring to the fact 
that military defeats are the result of internal decay, cowardice, want of 
character, and are a retribution for such things. 


If such were not the case, then a military defeat would lead to a national 
resurgence and bring the nation to a higher pitch of effort. 


A military defeat is not the tombstone of national life. History affords 
innumerable examples to confirm the truth of that statement. 


Unfortunately, Germany’s military overthrow was not an undeserved 
catastrophe, but a well-merited punishment which was in the nature of an 
eternal retribution. 


This defeat was more than deserved by us, for it represented the greatest 
external phenomenon of decomposition among a series of internal phenomena, 
which, although they were visible, were not recognised by the majority of the 
people, who follow the tactics of the ostrich and see only what they want to 
See; 


Let us examine the symptoms that were evident in Germany at the time 
that the German people accepted this defeat. Is it not true that in several circles 
the misfortunes of the Fatherland were even joyfully welcomed in the most 
shameful manner? 


Who could act in such a way without thereby meriting vengeance for his 
attitude? Were there not people who went even further and boasted that they 
had gone to the extent of weakening the front and causing a collapse? 


Therefore, it was not the enemy who brought this disgrace upon us, but 
rather our own countrymen. If they suffered misfortune for it afterwards, was 
that misfortune undeserved? 


25] 


Was there ever a case in history where a people declared itself guilty of 
a war, and that even against its conscience and its better judgment? 


No, and again no. In the manner in which the German nation reacted to its 
defeat we can see that the real cause of our collapse must be looked for 
elsewhere and not in the purely military loss of a few positions or the failure 
of an offensive, for if the front as such had given way and thus brought about a 
national disaster, then the German nation would have accepted the defeat in 
quite another spirit. 


It would have borne the subsequent misfortune with clenched teeth, or it 
would have been overwhelmed by sorrow. 


Regret and fury against an enemy into whose hands victory had been 
given by a chance event or the decree of Fate would have filled the hearts of 
the people, and in that case the nation, following the example of the Roman 
Senate, would have faced the defeated legions on their return and expressed 
their thanks for the sacrifices that had been made and would have urged them 
not to lose faith in the Reich. 


Even the capitulation would have been signed under the sway of calm 
reason, while the heart would have beaten in the hope of the coming revanche. 


That is the reception that would have been given to a military defeat 
which had to be attributed only to the adverse decree of Fortune. There would 
have been neither joy-making nor dancing. 


Cowardice would not have been boasted of, and the defeat would not 
have been honoured. On returning from the front, the troops would not have 
been mocked at, and the colours would not have been dragged in the dust, but 
above all, that disgraceful state of affairs, could never have arisen which 
induced a British officer, Colonel Repington, to declare with scorn, “Every 
third German is a traitor.” 


No, in sucha case this plague would never have assumed the proportions 
of a veritable flood, which, for the past five years, has smothered every vestige 
of respect for the German nation in the outside world. 


This shows only too clearly how false it is to say that the loss of the war 
was the cause of the German break-up. The military defeat was in itself but the 
consequence of a whole series of morbid symptoms and their causes which had 
become active in, the German nation before the war broke out. 


258 


The collapse was the first catastrophic consequence, visible to all, of 
how traditions and national morale had been poisoned and how the instinct of 
self-preservation had degenerated. These were the preliminary causes which, 
for many years, had been undermining the foundations of the nation and the 
Reich. 


It remained for the Jews, with their unqualified capacity for falsehood, 
and their fighting comrades, the Marxists, to impute responsibility for the 
downfall precisely to the man who alone had shown superhuman will-power 
and energy in his, effort to prevent the catastrophe which he had foreseen and 
to save the nation from that hour of complete overthrow and shame. 


By placing responsibility for the loss of the World War on the shoulders 
of Ludendorff, they took away the weapon of moral right from the only 
adversary dangerous enough to be likely to succeed in bringing the betrayers of 
the Fatherland to justice. 


All this was inspired by the principle which is quite true in itself—that 
in the big lie there is always a certain force of credibility; because the broad 
masses of a nation are always more easily corruptible in the deeper strata of 
their emotional nature than consciously or voluntarily had, and thus in the 
primitive simplicity of their minds they are readily fall victims to the big lie 
than to the small lie, since they themselves often tell small lies in little matters, 
but would be ashamed to resort to large-scale falsehood. 


It would never come into their heads to fabricate colossal untruths, and 
they would not believe that others could have the impudence to distort the truth 
so infamously. 


Even though the facts which prove this to be so are put clearly before 
them, they will still doubt and waver and will continue to think that there may 
be some other explanation, for the grossly impudent lie always leaves traces 
behind it, even after it has been nailed down—a fact which all expert liars in 
this world and all who conspire together in the art of lying know only too well 
and exploit in the basest manner. 


From time immemorial, however, the Jews have known better than any 
others how falsehood and calumny can be exploited. 


Is not their very existence founded on one great lie, namely, that they are 
a religious community, whereas in reality they are a race? 


259 


And what a race! One of the greatest thinkers that mankind has produced 
has branded the Jews for all time with a statement which is profoundly and 
exactly true. He called the Jew “the great master of lies.” 


Those who do not realise the truth of that statement, or do not wish to 
believe it, will never be able to lend a hand in helping truth to prevail. 


We may regard it as a great stroke of fortune for the German nation that 
its period of lingering suffering was so suddenly curtailed and transformed into 
such a terrible catastrophe, for if things had gone on as they were, the nation 
would, more slowly but more surely, have been ruined. 


The disease would have become chronic; whereas, in the acute form of 
the disaster, it at least showed itself clearly to the eyes of a considerable 
number of observers. 


It was not by accident that man conquered the black plague more easily 
than he has conquered tuberculosis. The first appeared in terrifying waves of 
death that shook the whole of mankind, the other advances insidiously; the first 
induced terror, the other gradual indifference. 


The result is, however, that men opposed the first with all the energy of 
which they were capable, whilst they try to arrest tuberculosis by feeble 
means. Thus man has mastered the black plague, while tuberculosis still gets 
the better of him. 


The same applies to diseases in nations. As long as these diseases are 
not of a catastrophic character, the population will slowly accustom itself to 
them and later succumb. 


It is then a stroke of luck—although a bitter one—when Fate decides to 
interfere in this slow process of decay and suddenly brings the victim face to 
face with the final stage of the disease. More often than not the result of a 
catastrophe is that a cure is at once undertaken and carried through with rigid 
determination, but even in such a case, the essential preliminary condition is 
always the recognition of the internal causes which have given rise to the 
disease in question. 


The important question here is the differentiation of the root causes from 
the circumstances developing out of them. This becomes all the more difficult 
the longer the germs of disease remain in the national body and the longer they 
are allowed to become an integral part of that body. 


260 


It may easily happen that, as time goes on, it will become so difficult to 
recognise certain definite virulent poisons as such that they are accepted as 
belonging to the national being, or they are merely tolerated as a necessary 
evil, so that drastic attempts to locate those alien germs are not held to be 
necessary. 


During the long period of peace prior to the last war, certain evils were 
apparent here and there although, with one or two exception, very little effort 
was made to discover their origin. 


Here again, these exceptions were primarily those phenomena in the 
economic life of the nation which were more apparent to the individual rather 
than the evil conditions existing in a good many other spheres. 


There were many signs of decay which ought to have been given serious 
thought. As far as economics were concerned, it may be said that the amazing 
increase of population in Germany before the war brought the question of 
providing daily bread into a more and more prominent position in all spheres 
of political and economic thought and action. 


Unfortunately, those responsible could not make up their minds to arrive 
at the only correct solution and preferred to reach their objective by cheaper 
methods. 


Repudiation of the idea of acquiring fresh territory and the substitution 
for it of the mad desire for the commercial conquest of the world was bound to 
lead eventually to unlimited and injurious industrialisation. 


The first and most fatal result brought about in this way was the 
weakening of the agricultural classes, whose decline was proportionate to the 
increase in the proletariat of the urban areas, until finally the equilibrium was 
completely upset. 


The big barrier dividing rich and poor now became apparent. Luxury and 
poverty lived so close to each other that the consequences were bound to be 
deplorable. Want and frequent unemployment began to play havoc with the 
people and left discontent and embitterment behind them. The result of this was 
to divide the population into political classes. 


Discontent increased in spite of commercial prosperity. Matters finally 
reached that stage which brought about the general conviction that ‘things 
cannot go on as they are,’ although no one seemed able to visualise what was 


261 


really going to happen. 


These were typical and visible signs of the depths which the prevailing 
discontent had reached. Far worse than these, however, were other 
consequences which became apparent as a result of the industrialisation of the 
nation. 


In proportion to the extent that commerce assumed definite control of the 
State, money became more and more of a god whom all had to serve and 
before whom all had to bow. 


Heavenly deities became more and more old-fashioned and were laid 
away in the corners to make room for the worship of Mammon. 


Thus began a period of utter degeneration which became especially 
pernicious because it set in at a time when the nation was more than ever in 
need of an exalted ideal, for a critical hour was threatening. 


Germany should have been prepared to protect with the sword her 
efforts to win her own daily bread ina peaceful way. 


Unfortunately, the predominance of money received support and sanction 
in the very quarter which ought to have been opposed to it. 


His Majesty, the Kaiser, made a mistake when he raised representatives 
of the new financial world to the ranks of the nobility. 


Admittedly, it may be offered as an excuse that even Bismarck failed to 
realise the threatening danger in this respect. In practice, however, all ideal 
virtues became secondary considerations to those of money, for it was clear 
that having once taken this road, the real old aristocracy would very soon rank 
second to the ennobled financiers. 


Financial operations succeed more easily than war operations. Hence it 
was no longer any great attraction for a true hero or even a statesman to be 
brought into touch with some Jewish banker. 


Real merit was not interested in receiving cheap decorations and 
therefore declined them with thanks. But from the standpoint of good breeding 
such a development was deeply regrettable. 


The aristocracy began to lose more and more those racial qualities that 
were a condition of its very existence, with the result that, in many cases, the 


262 


term ‘plebeian’ would have been more appropriate. 


A serious state of economic disruption was being brought about by the 
slow elimination of the personal control of vested interests and the gradual 
transference of the whole economic structure into the hands of joint-stock 
companies. In this way labour became degraded into an object of speculation 
in the hands of unscrupulous exploiters. The de-personalisation of property 
ownership increased on a vast scale. Financial exchange circles began to 
triumph and made slow but sure progress in assuming control of the whole of 
national life. 


Before the war, the internationalisation of the German economic 
structure had already begun by the roundabout way of share issues. It is true 
that a section of the German industrialists made determined attempts to avert 
the danger, but in the end they gave way before the united attacks of money- 
grabbing capitalism, which was assisted in this fight by its faithful henchman, 
the Marxist movement. 


The persistent war against German ‘heavy industries’ was the visible 
start of the internationalisation of German economic life as envisaged by the 
Marxists. 


This, however, could only be brought to a successful conclusion by the 
victory which Marxism was able to gain in the Revolution. 


As I write these words, success is attending the general attack on the 
German State Railways which are now to be turned over to international 
capitalists. Thus ‘International Social Democracy’ has once again attained one 
of its main objectives. 


The best evidence of how far this ‘commercialisation’ of the German 
nation was able to progress, can be seen plainly in the fact that when the war 
was over, one of the leading captains of German industry and commerce gave 
it as his opinion that commerce as such was the only force which could put 
Germany on her feet again. 


This sort of nonsense was uttered just at the time when France was re- 
establishing public education on a humanitarian basis, thus doing away with 
the idea that national life was dependent on commerce rather than on ideal 
values. 


The statement which Stinnes broadcast to the world at that time caused 


263 


incredible, confusion. It was immediately taken up and has become the leading 
motto of all those humbugs and babblers—the ‘statesmen’ whom Fate let loose 
on Germany after the Revolution. 


One of the worst evidences of decadence in Germany before the war 
was the ever-increasing habit of doing things by halves. This was one of the 
consequences of the insecurity that was felt all round, and it is to be attributed 
also to a certain timidity which resulted from one cause or another. The latter 
malady was aggravated by the educational system. 


German education in pre-war times had an extraordinary number of 
weak features. It was simply and exclusively limited to the production of pure 
knowledge and paid little attention to the development of practical ability. 


Still less attention was given to the development of individual character, 
in so far as this is ever possible, and hardly any attention at all was paid to the 
development of a sense of responsibility, to strengthening the will and the 
power of decision. The result of this method was not to turn out stalwart men, 
but rather docile creatures crammed with knowledge and to produce erudite 
people who had a passion for knowing everything. 


Before the war, we Germans were accepted and estimated accordingly. 
The German was liked because good use could be made of him; but there was 
little esteem for him personally, on account of his weakness of character. 


For those who can read its significance aright, there 1s much instruction 
in the fact that among all nationalities Germans were the first to part with their 
national citizenship when they found themselves in a foreign country, and there 
is a world of meaning in the saying that was then prevalent, that in hand one 
can go through the whole country. 


This kind of social etiquette turned out disastrous when it prescribed the 
exclusive forms that had to be observed in the presence of His Majesty. These 
forms insisted that there should be no contract fiction whatsoever, but that 
everything should be praised which His Majesty condescended to like. 


It was just here that the frank expression of manly dignity, and not 
subservience, was most needed because the monarchy as an institution was 
bound to fall as a result of this subservience, for such it was. 


Servility in the presence of monarchs may be good enough for the 
professional lackey and place-hunter, in fact for all those decadent beings who 


264 


feel more at their ease in close proximity to the throne than do honest citizens. 


These exceedingly ‘humble’ creatures, however, though the grovel before 
their lord and bread-giver, invariably put on airs of boundless superciliousness 
towards other mortals, which was particularly impudent when they posed as 
the only people who had the right to be called ‘monarchists.’ 


This was a gross piece of impertinence of which only despicable 
specimens among the newly-ennobled or yet-to-be-ennobled were capable. 


These have always been just the people who have prepared the way for 
the downfall of the monarchy and the monarchical principle. 


It could not be otherwise, for when a man is prepared to stand up for a 
cause, come what may, he never grovels before its representative. 


A man who is serious about the maintenance and welfare of an institution 
will cling to it with might and main and will not be able to .get over it, should 
that institution show certain faults and failings, and he will certainly not run 
around telling the world about it, as certain false democratic ‘friends’ of the 
monarchy have done; but he will approach His Majesty, the wearer of the 
crown himself, to warn him of the seriousness of the situation and persuade the 
monarch to act. 


Furthermore, he will not take up the standpoint that it must be left to His 
Majesty to act as the latter thinks fit, even though the course which he would 
take must plainly lead to disaster. 


The man I am thinking of will deem it his duty to protect the monarchy 
against the monarch himself, no matter what personal risk he may run in so 
doing. If the worth of the monarchical institution were dependent on the, person 
of the monarch himself, then it would be the worst institution imaginable; for 
only in rare cases are kings found to be models of wisdom, understanding and 
integrity of character, though we might like to think otherwise. 


This fact is unpalatable to the professional knaves and lackeys, but all 
upright men, and they are the backbone of the nation, repudiate the nonsensical 
fiction that all monarchs are wise, etc. 


For such men history is history and truth is truth, even where monarchs 
are concerned. It is so seldom that a nation has the good luck to possess a great 
king who is at the same time a great man, that it ought to consider itself 


265 


fortunate if malignant Fate has not reserved for it a still more terrible lot. 


It is clear that the worth and significance of the monarchical principle 
cannot rest in the person of the monarch alone, unless Heaven decrees that the 
crown should be set on the head of a brilliant hero like Frederick the Great, or 
a sagacious man like Wilhelm I. 


This may happen once in several centuries, but hardly oftener than that. 
The ideal of the monarchy takes precedence over the person of the monarch, 
inasmuch as the meaning of the institution must lie in the institution itself. 


Thus, the monarch may be reckoned in the category of those whose duty 
it is to serve. He, too, is but a wheel in the machine and as such he is obliged 
to do his duty towards it. He has to adapt himself for the fulfilment of high aims 
and your true ‘monarchist’ is not he who allows the wearer of the crown to 
commit crimes in its name, but he who prevents this. 


If, therefore, there were no significance attached to the idea itself and 
everything merely centred around the ‘sacred’ person, then it would never be 
possible to depose a ruler who has shown himself to be an imbecile. 


It is essential to resist upon this truth at the present time, because 
recently those phenomena which were in no small measure responsible for the 
collapse of the monarchy have appeared again. 


With a certain amount of naive impudence these persons once again talk 
about ‘their King’—that is to say the man whom they shamefully deserted a 
few years ago, at a most critical, hour. 


Those who refrain from participating in this chorus of lies are summarily 
classified as ‘bad Germans.’ 


They who make the charge are the same class of quitters who, in 1918, 
took to their heels at the very sight of a red armlet, left their Kaiser in the lurch, 
hastily changed their rifles for walking-sticks, took to wearing neutral- 
coloured ties, and disappeared from the limelight camouflaged as peace-loving 
citizens. 


All of a sudden these champions of royalty were nowhere to be found at 
that time. Circumspectly, one by one, these ‘servants and counsellors’ of the 
Crown reappeared to resume their lip-service to royalty, but only after others 
had borne the brunt of the anti-royalist attack and suppressed the Revolution 


266 


for them. 


Once again they are all there, wistfully eyeing the flesh-pots of Egypt and 
almost bursting with devotion for the royal cause. 


This will go on until the day comes when red badges are again in the 
ascendant. Then this whole ramshackle troupe of hangers-on of the old 
monarchy will scuttle off anew like mice from the cats. 


If monarchs were not themselves responsible for such things, one could 
not help sympathising with them, but they must realise: that with such 
champions, thrones may be lost, but never gained. 


All this devotion was a mistake and was the result of our whole system 
of education, which in this case brought about a particularly severe retribution. 


Such lamentable trumpery was kept up at the various courts, that the 
monarchy was slowly becoming undermined. When the whole structure finally 
did begin to totter, they vanished from mortal ken. 


Naturally, grovellers and lick-spittles are never willing to die for their 
masters. That monarchs never realise this, and seldom really take the trouble to 
learn it, has always been their undoing. 


One visible result of a wrong educational system was the fear of 
shouldering responsibility and the resultant weakness in dealing with obvious, 
vital problems of existence. 


The starting-point of this epidemic was, however, in our parliamentary 
institution where the shirking of responsibility was particularly fostered. 
Unfortunately, the disease slowly spread to all branches of everyday life and 
particularly affected the sphere of public affairs. 


Responsibility was being shirked everywhere and this led to insufficient 
or half-hearted measures being taken, personal responsibility for each action 
being reduced to a minimum. 


If we consider the attitude of various governments towards a whole 
series of really pernicious phenomena in public life, we shall at once 
recognise the fearful significance of this policy of half-measures and the lack 
of courage to assume responsibility. 


I shall single out only a few from the large number of instances known to 


267 


me. 


In journalistic circles it is a pleasing custom to speak of the press as a 
‘Great Power’ within the State. As a matter of fact its importance is immense. 
One cannot easily over-estimate it, for the press continues the work of 
education even in adult life. 


Generally speaking, readers of the press can be classified in three 
groups: First, those who believe everything they read; second, those who no 
longer believe anything; third, those who critically examine what they read and 
form their judgments accordingly. 


Numerically, the first group is by far the largest, being composed of the 
broad masses of the people. Intellectually, it forms the simplest portion of the 
nation. 


It cannot be classified according to occupation, but only into grades of 
intelligence. Under this category come all those who have not been born to 
think for themselves or who have not learnt to do so and who, partly through 
incompetence end partly through ignorance, believe everything that is set 
before them in print. 


To these we must add that type of lazy individual who, although capable 
of thinking for himself, out of sheer laziness gratefully absorbs everything that 
otters have thought out, modestly believing this to have been thoroughly done. 


The influence which the press has on all these people who constitute the 
broad masses of a nation, is therefore enormous. 


But somehow they are not in a position, or are not willing, personally to 
sift what is being served up to them, so that their whole attitude towards daily 
problems is almost solely the result of extraneous influence. 


All this can be advantageous where public enlightenment is of a serious 
and truthful character, but great harm is done when scoundrels and liars take a 
hand at this work. 


The second group is numerically smaller, being partly composed of those 
who were formerly in the first group and after a series of bitter 
disappointments are now prepared to believe nothing of what they see in print. 


They hate all newspapers. Either they do not read them at all or they 


268 


become exceptionally annoyed at their contents, which they hold to be nothing 
but a conglomery of lies and mis-statements. 


These people are difficult to handle, for they will always be sceptical of 
the truth. Consequently, they are useless for any form of positive work. 


The third group is easily the smallest, being composed of real 
intellectuals whom natural aptitude and education have taught to think for 
themselves and who in all things try to form their own judgments, while at the 
same time carefully sifting what they read. 


They will not read any newspaper without using their own intelligence to 
collaborate with that of the writer, and naturally this does not set writers an 
easy task. Journalists appreciate this type of reader only with a certain amount 
of reservation. 


Hence the trash that newspapers are capable of serving up 1s of little 
danger—nmuch less of importance to the members of this third group of readers. 


In the majority of cases these readers have learnt to regard every 
journalist as fundamentally a rogue who sometimes speaks the truth. 


Most unfortunately, the value of these readers lies in their intelligence, 
and not in their numerical strength an unhappy state of affairs in a period where 
wisdom counts for nothing and majorities for everything. 


Nowadays, when the voting papers of the masses are the deciding factor, 
the decision lies in the hands of the numerically strongest group; that is to say 
the first group, the crowd of simpletons and the credulous. 


It is an all-important interest of the State and a national duty to prevent 
these people from falling into the hands of false, ignorant or even evil-minded 
teachers. Therefore it is the duty of the State to supervise their education and 
prevent every form of offence in this respect. 


Particular attention should be paid to the press; for its influence on these 
people is by far the strongest and most penetrating of all, since its effect is not 
transitory but continual. Its immense significance lies in the uniform and 
persistent repetition of its teaching. 


Here, if anywhere, the State should never forget that all means should 
converge towards the same end. It must not be led astray by the will-o’-the- 


269 


wisp of so-called ‘freedom of the press,’ or be talked into neglecting its duty, 
and withholding from the nation that which is good and which does good. 


With ruthless determination the State must keep control of this instrument 
of popular education and place it at the service of the State and the nation. 


But what sort of pabulum was it that the German press served up for the 
consumption of its readers in pre-war days? Was it not the most virulent poison 
imaginable? Was not pacifism in its worst form inoculated into our people at a 
time when others were preparing slowly but surely to pounce upon Germany? 


Did not this self-same press of ours instil into the public mind even in 
peacetime a doubt as to the sovereign rights of the State itself, thereby already 
handicapping the State in choosing its means of defence? 


Was it not the German press that understood how to make all the 
nonsensical talk about ‘Western Democracy’ palatable to our people, until an 
exuberant public was eventually prepared to entrust its future to the League of 
Nations? 


Was not this press instrumental in bringing about a state of moral 
degradation among our people? Were not morals and public decency made to 
look ridiculous and classed as out-of-date and banal, until finally our people 
also became ‘modern’? 


By means of persistent attacks, did not the press keep on undermining the 
authority of the State, until one blow sufficed to bring this institution tottering 
to the ground? 


Did not the press oppose with all its might every move to give the State 
that which belongs to the State, and be means of constant criticism injure the 
reputation of the Army, sabotage general conscription and demand refusal of 
military credits, etc.—until the success of this campaign was assured? The 
function of the so-called liberal press was to dig the grave for the German 
people and Reich. No mention need be made of the lying Marxist press. 


To it the spreading of falsehood is as much a vital necessity as hunting 1s 
to a cat. Its sole task is to break the national backbone of the people, thus 
preparing the nation to become the slaves of international finance and its 
masters, the Jews. 


What measures did the State take to counteract this wholesale poisoning 


270 


of the public mind? Absolutely none. The passing of a few paltry decrees, 
punishment meted out in a few cases of flagrant infamy, and there the matter 
ended. 


By this policy it was hoped to win the favour of this pest by means of 
flattery, by a recognition of the ‘value’ of the press, is ‘importance,’ its 
‘educative mission’ and similar nonsense. The Jews acknowledged all this 
with a knowing smile and returned thanks. 


The reason for this ignominious failure on the part of the State lay not so 
much in its refusal to realise the danger as in the out-and-out cowardly way of 
meeting the situation by the adoption of faulty and ineffective measures. No one 
had the courage to employ any energetic and radical methods. 


Everyone temporised in some way or other and instead of striking at its 
heart, only irritated the viper the more. The result was that not only did 
everything remain as it was, but the power of this institution, which should 
have been combated, grew greater from year to year. 


The defence put up by the government in those days against a mainly 
Jew-controlled press that was slowly corrupting the nation, followed no 
definite line of action, it had no determination ‘behind it and above all, no 
fixed objective’ whatsoever in view. 


This is where official understanding of the situation completely failed, 
not only in estimating the importance of the struggle, but in choosing the means 
and deciding on a definite plan. 


They merely tinkered with the problem. Occasionally when bitten, they 
imprisoned one or another journalistic viper for a few weeks or months, but 
the whole poisonous brood was allowed to carry on in peace. 


It must be admitted that all this was partly the result of extraordinarily 
crafty tactics on the part of Jewry on the one hand, and obvious, official 
stupidity or naivety, on the other. 


The Jews were too clever to allow a simultaneous attack to be made on 
the whole of their press. One section functioned as cover for the other. While 
the Marxist newspaper, in the most despicable manner possible, reviled 
everything that was sacred, furiously attacked the State and government and 
incited certain classes of the community against each other, bourgeois- 
democratic papers, also in Jewish hands, succeeded in camouflaging 


271 


themselves as model examples of objectivity. They studiously avoided harsh 
language, knowing well that blockheads are capable of judging only by 
external appearances and are never able to penetrate to the real depth and 
meaning of anything. They measure the worth of an object by its exterior and 
not by its contents. This form of human frailty was carefully studied and 
understood by the press. 


By this class of blockheads, the Frankfurter Zeitung would be 
acknowledged as the essence of respectability. It always carefully avoided 
calling a spade a spade. 


It deprecated the use of every form of physical force and persistently 
appealed to the nobility of fighting with ‘intellectual’ weapons. 


This method of fighting was, curiously enough, most popular with the 
least intellectual classes. That is one of the results of our defective education, 
which deprives young people of their natural instincts, pumps into them a 
certain amount of knowledge without, however, being able to give them real 
insight, since this requires not only diligence and goodwill, but innate 
understanding. 


This final insight at which man must aim is the understanding of causes 
which an instinctive and fundamental. 


Let me explain: Man must not fall into the error of thinking that he was 
ever meant to become lord and master of Nature. 


A lopsided education has helped to encourage that illusion. Man must 
realise that a fundamental law of necessity reigns throughout the whole realm 
of Nature and that his existence is subject to the law of eternal struggle and 
strife. 


He will then feel that there cannot be a separate law for mankind ina 
universe in which planets and suns follow their orbits, where moons and 
planets trace their destined paths, where the strong are always the masters of 
the weak and where the latter must obey or be destroyed. 


Man must also submit to the eternal principles of this supreme wisdom. 
He may try to understand them but he can never free himself from their sway. 


It is just for our intellectual demi-monde that the Jew writes those papers 
which he calls his ‘intellectual’ press. For them the Frankfurter Zeitung and 


212 


Berliner Tageblatt are written, the tone being adapted to them, and it is over 
these people that such papers have an influence. 


While studiously avoiding all forms of expression that might strike the 
reader as crude, the poison is injected from other vials into the hearts of the 
clientele. 


The effervescent tone and the fine phraseology lull the reader into 
believing that a love for knowledge and more it principle is the sole driving 
force that determines the policy of such papers, whereas in reality these 
features represent a sunning way of disarming any opposition that might be 
directed against the press. 


Some make a parade of respectability and the imbecile public is all the 
more ready to believe them since the others indulge only in moderate ravings 
which never amount to abuse of the ‘freedom of the press’ (as this system of 
feeding the public on lies and poisoning the public mind 1s called). 


Hence, the authorities are very slow indeed to take any steps against 
these journalistic bandits for fear of immediately alienating the sympathy of the 
so-called respectable press fear that is only too well founded, for the moment 
any attempt is made to proceed against any member of the gutter press all the 
others rush to its assistance at once, not indeed to support its policy, but simply 
and solely to defend the principles of freedom of the press and liberty of 
public opinion. 


This outcry will succeed in intimidating the most stalwart, for 1t comes 
from the mouth of what is called decent journalism. 


In this way the, poison was allowed to enter the national bloodstream 
and infect public life, without the government taking any effectual measures to 
master the course of the disease. 


The ridiculous half-measures that were taken were in themselves an 
indication of the process of disintegration that was already threatening to break 
up the Reich, for an institution practically surrenders its existence when it is no 
Longer determined to defend itself with all the weapons at its command. 


Every half-measure is the outward expression of an internal process of 
decay which must lead to an external collapse sooner or later. 


I believe that our present generation would easily master this danger, if it 


273 


were led aright, for it has gone through certain experiences which must have 
strengthened the nerves of all those who were not broken by them. 


Certainly in days to come the Jews will raise a tremendous cry in their 
newspapers once a hand is laid on their favourite nest, once a move is made to 
put an end to this scandalous press and once this instrument which moulds 
public opinion is brought under State control and no longer left in the hands of 
aliens and enemies of the people. 


I am certain that this will be easier for us than it was for our fathers. The 
scream of the twelve-inch shell is more penetrating than the hiss of a thousand 
Jewish newspaper vipers. Therefore, let them go on with their hissing. 


A further example of the weak and hesitating way in which vital national 
problems were dealt with in pre-war Germany is the following. Hand-in-hand 
with the political and moral process of infecting the nation, an equally virulent 
process of infection had for many years been attacking the health of the nation. 


In large cities particularly, syphilis steadily increased and tuberculosis 
kept pace with it in reaping its harvest of death in almost every part of the 
country. 


Although in both cases the effect on the nation was alarming, it seemed 
as if nobody were ina position to undertake any decisive measures against 
these scourges. 


In the case of syphilis especially, the attitude of the State and the public 
authorities was one of absolute capitulation. To combat this state of affairs 
measures more sweeping than those actually adopted should have been 
enforced. 


The discovery of a remedy which was of a questionable nature and the 
excellent way in which it was placed on the market were of little assistance ill 
fighting such a scourge. Here again the only course to adopt 1s to attack the 
causes rather than the symptoms of the disease, but in this case, the primary 
cause 1s to be found in the manner in which love has been prostituted. 


Even though this did not directly bring about the fearful disease itself, the 
nation must still suffer serious damage thereby, for the moral havoc resulting 
from this prostitution would be sufficient to bring about the destruction of, the 
nation, slowly but surely. 


274 


This Judaising of our spiritual life and mammonising of our natural 
instinct for procreation will sooner or later work havoc with our whole 
posterity. 


Instead of strong, healthy children, the product of natural feelings, we 
shall see miserable specimens of humanity resulting from economic 
calculation, for economic considerations are becoming more and more the 
foundation and the sole preliminary condition of marriage while love looks for 
an outlet elsewhere. 


Here as elsewhere, one may defy Nature for a certain period of time, but 
sooner or later she will take her inevitable revenge, and when man realises 
this truth, it is often too late. 


Our own nobility furnishes an example of the devastating consequences 
that result from a persistent refusal to recognise the primary conditions 
necessary for normal wedlock. 


Here we are face to face with the results of procreation which is, on the 
one hand, determined by social pressure and, on the other, by financial 
considerations. 


The one leads to inherited debility, and the other to adulteration of the 
blood-strain; for all the Jewish daughters of the department store proprietors 
are looked upon as eligible mates to co-operate in propagating his lordship’s 
stock, and the stock certainly looks it. All this leads to absolute degeneration. 


Nowadays our bourgeoisie is making efforts to follow in the same path. 
Theirs will be a similar fate. 


These unpleasant truths are hastily and nonchalantly brushed aside, as if 
by so doing the real state of affairs could also be abolished, but it cannot be 
denied that the population of our great towns and cities is tending more and 
more to avail itself of prostitution in the exercise of its amorous instincts and is 
thus becoming more and more contaminated by the scourge of venereal 
disease. 


On the one hand, the visible effects of this mass-infection can be 
observed in our lunatic asylums and, on the other hand, alas! among the 
children. These are the doleful and tragic products of the steadily increasing 
scourge that is poisoning our sexual life. Their sufferings are the visible results 
of parental vice. 


215 


There are many ways of becoming resigned to this unpleasant and 
terrible fact. Many people go about seeing nothing or, to be more correct, not 
wanting to see anything. This is by far the simplest and cheapest attitude to 
adopt. 


Others cover themselves in the sacred mantle of prudery, as ridiculous as 
itis false. They describe the whole condition of affairs as sinful and are 
profoundly indignant when brought face to face with a victim. 


They close their eyes to this godless scourge in pious horror and pray to 
the Almighty that He—if possible after their own death—may rain down fire 
and brimstone as on Sodom and Gomorrah and so once again make a lasting 
example of this shameless section of humanity. 


Finally, there are those who are well aware of the terrible results which 
this scourge will inevitably bring about, but they merely shrug their shoulders, 
fully convinced of their inability to undertake anything against this peril. 
Hence, matters are allowed to take their course. 


Undoubtedly all this is very convenient and simple, only the fact must not 
be overlooked that this convenient way of approaching things can leave fatal 
consequences for our national life. 


The excuse that other nations are not faring any better does not alter the 
fact of our own deterioration, except that the feeling of sympathy for other 
stricken nations makes our own suffering easier to bear. 


But the important question that arises here is, Which nations will be the 
first to take the initiative in mastering this scourge, and which nations will 
succumb to it? This will be the final upshot of the whole situation. This will be 
an acid test of racial value. 


The race that fails to come through the test will simply die out and its 
place will be taken by the healthier ant stronger races, which will be able to 
endure greater hardships. 


As this problem primarily concerns posterity, it belongs to that category 
of which it is said with terrible justification that the sins of the fathers are 
visited on their offspring unto the tenth generation. This is a consequence 
which follows on an infringement of the laws of blood and race. The sin 
against blood and race is the hereditary sin in this world and it brings disaster 
on every nation that commits it. 


276 


The attitude towards this one vital problem in pre-war Germany was 
most regrettable. What measures were adopted to arrest the infection of our 
youth in the large cities? 


What was done to put an end to the contamination and mammonisation of 
sexual life among us? What was done to fight the resultant spreading of 
syphilis throughout the whole of our people? 


The reply to this question can best be illustrated by showing what should 
have been done. 


Instead of tackling this problem in a haphazard way, the authorities 
should leave realised that the happiness or unhappiness of future generations 
depended on its solution and indeed that the nation’s entire future may, perhaps 
needs must, depend thereon. 


To have admitted this would have demanded that active measures be 
carried out ina ruthless manner. The primary condition would have been that 
the enlightened attention of the whole country should be concentrated on this 
terrible danger, so that every individual would realise the importance of 
fighting against it. 


It would be futile to impose obligations of a definite character which are 
often difficult to bear and expect them to become generally effective, unless the 
public were thoroughly instructed in the necessity of imposing and accepting 
such obligations. 


This demands a widespread and systematic method of enlightenment, and 
all other daily problems that might distract public attention from this great 
central problem should be relegated to the background. 


In every case where there are exigencies or tasks that seem impossible to 
deal with successfully, public opinion must be concentrated on the one 
problem, under the conviction that the solution of this problem alone is a 
matter of life or death. 


Only in this way can public interest be aroused to such a pitch as will 
urge people to combine in a great voluntary effort and achieve important 
results. 


This fundamental truth applies also to the individual, provided he is 
desirous of attaining some great end. He must always concentrate his efforts on 


214 


one definitely limited stage of his progress which has to be completed before 
the next step be attempted. 


Those who do not endeavour to realise their aims step by step, and who 
do not concentrate their energy on reaching the individual stages, will never 
attain the final objective. 


At some stage or other they will falter and fail. This systematic way of 
approaching an objective is an art in itself and always calls for the expenditure 
of every ounce of energy in order to conquer step after step of the road. 


Therefore, the most essential preliminary condition necessary for an 
attack on such a difficult stage of the human road 1s that the authorities should 
succeed in convincing the masses that the immediate objective which is now 
being fought for is the only one that deserves to be considered and the only one 
on which everything depends. 


The broad masses are never able to see clearly the whole stretch of the 
road lying in front of them, without becoming tired and thus losing faith in their 
ability to complete the task. 


To a certain extent they will keep the objective in mind, but they are only 
able to survey the whole road in small stages, as in the case of the traveller 
who knows where his journey is going to end, but who masters the endless 
stretch far better by attacking it in stages. Only in this way can he keep up his 
determination and reach the final objective. 


It is in this way, with the assistance of every form of propaganda, that the 
problem of fighting venereal disease should be placed before the public—not 
as a task for the nation but as the main task. 


Every possible means should be employed to bring the truth about this 
scourge home to the minds of the people, until the whole nation has been 
convinced that everything depends on the solution of this problem: that is to 
say, a healthy future or national decay. 


Only after such preparatory measures have been taken—if necessary, 
spread over a period of many years—will public attention and public 
resolution be fully aroused, and only then can serious and definite measures be 
undertaken without the risk of these not being fully understood or of the 
authorities being suddenly faced with a slackening of the public will. 


278 


It must be made clear to all that a serious fight against this scourge calls 
for vast sacrifices and an enormous amount of work. 


To wage war against syphilis means fighting against prostitution, against 
prejudice, against old-established customs, against current fashion, public 
opinion, and, last but not least, again false prudery in certain circles. 


The first preliminary condition to be fulfilled, before the State can claim 
a moral right to fight against all these things, is that the young generation should 
be afforded facilities for contracting early marriages. 


Late marriages have the sanction of a custom which, from whatever 
angle we view it, is, and will remain, a disgrace to humanity, an institution 
which ill befits a creature who is wont to regard himself as having been 
fashioned in God’s image. 


Prostitution is a disgrace to humanity and cannot be removed simply by 
academic or charitable methods. Its restriction and final extermination 
presupposes the removal of a whole series of contributory circumstances. 


The first remedy must always be to establish such conditions as will 
make early marriages possible, especially for young men—for women are, 
after all, only the passive factor. An illustration of the extent to which people 
nowadays are labouring under a delusion, is afforded by the fact that not 
infrequently one hears mothers in so-called ‘better’ circles openly expressing 
their satisfaction at having found as a husband for their daughter, a man who 
has already sown his wild oats, etc. 


As there is usually so little shortage of men of this type, the poor girl 
finds no difficulty in getting a mate of this description, and the children of this 
marriage are a visible result of such supposedly sensible unions. 


When one realises, apart from this, that every possible effort 1s being 
made to hinder the process of procreation and that Nature is being wilfully 
cheated of her rights, there remains really only one question: Why is such an 
institution as marriage still in existence, and what are its functions? 


Is it really nothing better than prostitution? Does our duty to posterity no 
longer play any part? Or do people not realise the nature of the curse they are 
inflicting on themselves and their offspring by such criminally foolish neglect 
of one of the primary laws of Nature? 


279 


This is how civilised nations degenerate and gradually perish. 


Marriage is not an end in itself but must serve the greater end, which is 
that of increasing and maintaining the human species and the race. This is its 
only meaning and purpose. 


This being admitted, then it 1s clear that the institution of marriage must 
be judged by the manner in which its allotted function is fulfilled. 


Therefore, early marriages should be the rule, because thus the young 
couple will still have that pristine force which is the fountainhead of a healthy 
posterity with unimpaired powers of resistance. 


Of course early marriages cannot be made the rule unless a whole series 
of social measures are first introduced without which early marriage cannot 
even be thought of. 


In other words, a solution of this question, which seems a small problem 
in itself, cannot be brought about without adopting radical measures to alter the 
social background. 


The importance of such measures ought to be studied and properly 
estimated, especially at a time when the so-called ‘social’ Republic has shown 
itself unable to solve the housing problem and has thus made it impossible for 
innumerable couples to get married. That sort of policy prepares the way for 
the further advance of prostitution. 


Another reason why early marriages are impossible is our nonsensical 
method of regulating the scale of salaries, which pays far too little attention to 
the problem of family support. 


Prostitution, therefore, can only be really seriously tackled if, by means 
of a radical social reform, early marriage is made easier than hitherto. This is 
the first preliminary necessity for the solution of this problem. 


Secondly, a whole series of false notions must be eradicated from our 
system of bringing up and educating children, a thing which hitherto no one 
seems to have worried about. 


In our present educational system a balance will have to be established, 
first and foremost, between mental instruction and physical training. 


What is known as the Gymnasium to-day is a positive insult to the Greek 


280 


institution. Our system of education entirely loses sight of the fact that, in the 
long run, a healthy mind can exist only ina healthy body. This statement 
applies with few exceptions, particularly to the broad masses of the nation. 


In the pre-war Germany there was a time when no one, took the trouble 
to think over this truth. Training of the body was criminally neglected, the one- 
sided training of the mind being regarded as a sufficient guarantee for the 
nation’s greatness. 


This mistake was destined to show its effects sooner than had been 
anticipated. It is not pure chance that the Bolshevist teaching flourishes in those 
regions whose degenerate population has been brought to the verge of 
starvation, as, for example, in the case of Central Germany, Saxony, and the 
Ruhr. 


In all these districts there is a marked absence of any serious resistance, 
even by the so-called intellectual classes, against this Jewish contagion, and 
the simple reason is that the intellectual classes are themselves physically 
degenerate, not through privation, but through education. 


The exclusive intellectualism of the education in vogue among our upper 
classes makes them unfit for life’s struggle in an epoch in which physical force, 
and not intellect, is the dominating factor. 


Thus, they are neither capable of maintaining themselves, nor of making 
their way in life. In nearly every case physical disability is the forerunner of 
personal cowardice. 


The extravagant emphasis laid on purely intellectual education and the 
consequent neglect of physical training must necessarily lead to sexual thoughts 
in early youth. 


Those boys whose constitutions have been trained and hardened by 
sports and gymnastics are less prone to sexual indulgence than those stay-at- 
homes who have been fed exclusively with mental pabulum. 


Sound methods of education cannot, however, afford to disregard this 
and we must not forget that what a healthy young man demands from a woman 
will differ from the demands of a weakling who has been prematurely 
corrupted. 


Thus in every branch of our education the day’s curriculum must be 


281 


arranged so as to occupy a boy’s free time in profitable development of his 
physical powers. He has no right in those years to loaf about, becoming a 
nuisance in public streets and in cinemas; but when his day’s work, is done he 
ought to harden his young body so that his strength may not be found wanting 
when the occasion arises. 


To prepare for this and to carry it out should be the function of our 
educational system and not exclusively to cram him with knowledge. 


Our school system must also rid itself of the notion that the training of the 
body is a task that should be left to the individual himself. There is no such 
thing as freedom to sin against posterity and thus against the race. 


The fight against pollution of the mind must be waged simultaneously 
with the training of the body. To-day the whole of our public life may be 
compared to a hot-house for the forced growth of sexual notions and 
excitements. 


A glance at the till-of-fare provided by our cinemas, playhouses and 
theatres, suffices to prove that this 1s not the right food, especially for our 
young people. Hoardings and advertisement kiosks combine to attract the 
public in the most vulgar manner. 


Anyone who has not altogether lost contact with adolescent yearnings 
will realise that all this must have very grave consequences. This seductive 
and sensuous atmosphere puts into the heads of our youth notions of which, at 
their age, they ought still to be ignorant. 


Unfortunately, the results of this kind of education can best be seen in our 
contemporary youth who are prematurely grown up and, therefore, old before 
their time. 


The courts of law throw from, time to time a distressing light on the 
spiritual life of our fourteen and fifteen-year-old-children. 


Who, therefore, will be surprised to learn that venereal disease claims 
as victims at this age? And is it not a frightful scandal to see the number of 
young men physically weak and intellectually ruined, who have been 
introduced to the mysteries of marriage by the whores of the big cities? 


Those who want seriously to combat prostitution must first of all assist 
in removing the spiritual conditions on which it thrives. They will have to 


282 


clean up the moral pollution of our city ‘culture’ fearlessly and without regard 
for the outcry that will follow. 


If we do not drag our youth out of the morass of their present 
environment they will be engulfed by it. Those people who do not want to see 
these things are deliberately encouraging them and are guilty of spreading the 
effects of prostitution to the future, for the future belongs to our younger 
generation. 


This process of cleansing our Kultur will have to be applied in 
practically all spheres. The stage, art, literature, the cinema, the press and 
advertisement posters, all must have the stains of pollution removed and be 
used in the service of a national and cultural ideal. 


The life of the people must be freed from the asphyxiating perfume of our 
modern eroticism and also from every unmanly and prudish form of insincerity. 
In all these things, the aim and the method must be determined by thoughtful 
consideration for the preservation of our national well-being in body and soul. 


The right to personal freedom comes second in importance to the duty of 
preserving the race. 


Only after such measures have been put into practice can a medical 
campaign against this scourge begin with some hope of success. But here again 
half-measures will be valueless. 


Far-reaching and important decisions will have to be made. It would be 
doing things by halves if incurables were given the opportunity of infecting one 
healthy person after another. 


This would be practising that kind of humanitarianism which allows 
hundreds to perish in order to prevent the suffering of one individual. 


The demand that it should be made impossible for defective people to 
continue to propagate defective offspring is a demand that is based on most 
reasonable grounds, and its proper fulfilment is the most humane task that 
mankind has to face. 


Unhappy and undeserved suffering will be prevented in millions of 
cases, with the result that there will be a gradual improvement in national 
health. 


283 


A determined decision to act in this manner will at the same time 
provide an obstacle against the further spread of venereal disease. 


It would then be a case, where necessary, of mercilessly isolating all 
incurables—perhaps a barbaric measure for those unfortunates—but a blessing 
for the present generation and for posterity. 


The temporary pain thus experienced in this century can, and will, save 
thousands of future generations from suffering. 


The fight against syphilis and its pace-maker, prostitution, 1s one of the 
gigantic tasks of mankind; gigantic, because it is not merely a case of solving a 
single problem, but of the removal of a whole series of evils which are the 
contributory causes of this scourge. 


Disease of the body in this case is merely the result of a diseased 
condition of the moral, social, and racial instincts. 


If, for reasons of indolence or cowardice, this fight is not fought to a 
finish, we may imagine what conditions will be like five centuries hence. Little 
of God’s image will be left in human nature, except to mock the Creator. 


What has been done in Germany to counteract this scourge? If we think 
calmly over the answer we shall find it distressing. 


It is true that in governmental circles the terrible and injurious effects of 
this disease were well known, but the counter-measures which were officially 
adopted were ineffective and a hopeless failure. 


They tinkered with cures for the symptoms wholly regardless of the 
cause of the disease. Prostitutes were medically examined and controlled as 
far as possible, and when signs of infection were apparent they were sent to 
hospital. 


When outwardly cured, they were once more let loose on humanity. It is 
true that ‘protective legislation’ was introduced which made sexual intercourse 
a punishable offence for all those not completely cured, or for those suffering 
from venereal disease. 


This legislation was correct in theory, but in practice, it failed 
completely. In the First place, in the majority of cases women will decline to 
appear in court as witnesses against men who have robbed them of their health. 


284 


Women would be exposed far more than men to uncharitable remarks in 
such cases, and one can imagine what their position would be if they had been 
infected by their own husbands. 


Should women in that case bring a charge? Or what should they do? In 
the case of the man there is the additional fact that he is frequently unfortunate 
enough to run up against this danger when he is under the influence of alcohol. 


His condition makes it impossible for him to assess the qualities of his 
‘amorous beauty,’ a fact which is well known to every diseased prostitute and 
makes her single out men in this ‘ideal’ condition for preference. 


The result is that the unfortunate man is not able to recollect later on who 
his compassionate benefactress was, which is not surprising in cities like 
Berlin and Munich. 


Many such cases are visitors from the provinces who, held helpless and 
enthralled by the magic charm of city life, become an easy prey for prostitutes. 


Finally, who is able to say whether he has been ‘infected or not? Are 
there not innumerable cases on record where an apparently cured person has a 
relapse and does untold harm without knowing it? 


Therefore, in practice, the results of these legislative measures are 
negative. The same applies to the control of prostitution, and, finally, even 
medical treatment and cure are today still unsafe and doubtful. 


One thing only is certain, the scourge has spread further and further in 
spite of all precautionary measures, and this alone suffices definitely to prove 
and substantiate their inefficacy. 


Everything else that was undertaken was just as ineffectual as it was 
absurd. The spiritual prostitution of the people was neither arrested nor was 
anything whatsoever undertaken in this direction. 


Those, however, who do not regard this subject as a serious one would 
do well to examine the statistical data of the spread of this disease, study its 
growth in the last century and contemplate the possibilities of its further 
development. The ordinary observer, unless he were particularly stupid, would 
experience a cold shudder if the a certain historical value, rather than the 
products of not merely artistic but even mental degeneration bordering on the 
futile. 


285 


Here, in the cultural sphere, the signs of the coming political collapse 
first became manifest. 


The Bolshevisation of art is the only cultural form of life and the only 
spiritual manifestation of which Bolshevism is capable. 


Anyone to whom this statement may appear strange need only take a 
glance at those lucky States which have become Bolshevised and, to his horror, 
he will there recognise those morbid monstrosities which have been produced 
by insane and degenerate people. 


All those artistic aberrations which, since the beginning of the present 
century, have been classified under the names Cubism and Dadaism, are 
manifestations of art which have come to be officially recognised by the State 
itself. 


This phenomenon made its appearance even during the short-lived 
period of the Soviet Republic in Bavaria. At that time one might easily have 
recognised how all the official posters, propaganda pictures and newspapers, 
etc., showed signs not only of political, but also of cultural decadence. 


About sixty years ago a political collapse such as we are experiencing 
to-day would have been just as inconceivable as the cultural decline which has 
been manifested in Cubist and Futurist pictures ever since 1900. 


Sixty years ago an exhibition of so-called Dadaist ‘experiences’ would 
have been an absolutely preposterous idea. The organisers of such an 
exhibition would then have been certified fit for the lunatic asylum, whereas 
to-day they are appointed presidents of art societies. 


At that time such an epidemic would never have been allowed to spread. 
Public opinion would not have tolerated it, and the government would not have 
remained silent, for it is the duty of a government to save the people from being 
driven into such intellectual madness. 


Intellectual madness would have resulted from a development that 
followed the acceptance of this kind of art. It would have marked one of the 
worst changes in human history, for it would have meant that a retrogressive 
process had begun to take place in the human brain, the final stages of which 
would have been unthinkable. 


If we study the course of our cultural life during the last twenty-five 


286 


years we shall be astonished to note how far we have already gone in this 
process of retrogression. 


Everywhere we find the presence of those germs which give rise to 
protuberant growths that must sooner or later bring about the ruin of our 
culture. Here we find undoubted symptoms of slow corruption, and woe to the 
nations that are no longer able to bring that morbid process to a halt! In almost 
all the various fields of German art and culture these morbid phenomena may 
be observed. Here everything seems to have passed the culminating point of its 
excellence and to have entered the curve of a hasty decline. 


At the beginning of the century the theatres seemed already degenerate 
and ceased to be cultural factors, except the Court theatres, which opposed the 
prostitution of the national art. 


Apart from these, and a few other praiseworthy exceptions, the plays 
produced on the stage were of such a nature that people would have benefited 
by not visiting them at all. 


A sad symptom of internal decay was manifested in the fact that it was 
impossible to allow adolescents to frequent most of these so-called ‘centres of 
art,’ a brazen admission that this was so, being the notice exhibited at the 
entrance-doors: Adults only. 


Let it be borne in mind that these precautions had to be taken in regard to 
institutions whose main purpose should have been to promote the education of 
the youth and not merely to provide amusement for sophisticated adults. 


What would the great dramatists of other times have said of such 
measures and, above all, of the conditions which made these measures 
necessary? How exasperated Schiller would have been, and how Goethe 
would have turned away in disgust! 


But what are Schiller, Goethe and Shakespeare when confronted with the 
heroes of our modern German literature? Old, frowsy, out-moded and finished, 
for it was typical of this epoch that not only were its own products bad, but that 
it reviled everything that had been really great in the past. 


This is a phenomenon that is very characteristic of such epochs. The 
more vile and miserable the men and products of an epoch, the more they will 
hate and denigrate the ideal achievements of former generations. 


287 


What these people would like best would be to destroy completely every 
vestige of the past, in order to do away with that sole standard of comparison 
which prevents their own daubs from being looked upon as art. 


Therefore the more lamentable and wretched the products of each new 
era, the more it will try to obliterate all the memorials of the past. Any real 
innovation that is for the benefit of mankind can always face comparison with 
the best of what has gone before, and frequently even serves to reveal the true 
value of the latter. 


There is no fear that modem productions of real value will look pale and 
worthless beside the monuments of the past. What is contributed to the general 
treasury of human culture often fulfils a part that is necessary in order to keep 
the memory of old achievements alive, because this memory alone is the 
standard whereby our own works are properly appreciated. 


Only those who have nothing of value to give to the world, but pretend 
that they have much to bestow, will oppose everything that already exists and 
would have it destroyed at all costs. This holds good not only for new 
phenomena in the cultural domain, but also in politics. The more inferior new 
revolutionary movements are, the more will they try to denigrate the old forms. 


Here again the desire to palm off their shoddy products as great and 
original achievements leads them into a blind hatred against everything which 
belongs to the past and which is superior to their own work. 


As long as the historical memory of Frederick the Great, for instance, 
still lives, Friedrich Ebert can arouse only a problematic admiration. The 
relation of the hero of Sans Souci to the former publican of Bremen may be 
compared to that of the sun to the moon, for the moon can shine only after the 
direct rays of the sun have left the earth. 


Thus we can readily understand why it 1s that all the new moons in 
human history have hated the fixed stars. In the field of politics, if Fate should 
happen temporarily to place the ruling power in the hands of these nonentities, 
they are not only eager to defile and revile the past, but at the same time they 
will use any means to evade criticism of their own acts. 


The Law for the Protection of the Republic, which the new German State 
enacted, may be taken as an example illustrating this truth. 


One has good reason to be suspicious in regard to any new idea, or any 


288 


doctrine or philosophy, any political or economic movement, which tries to 
deny everything that the past has produced or to represent it as inferior and 
worthless. 


Such an antipathy is usually due to a sense of inferiority or to malicious 
intention. Any new movement which is really beneficial to human progress 
will always have to begin its constructive work at the level at which the last 
stones of the structure have been laid. 


It need not blush to utilise those truths which have already been 
established, for all human culture, as well as man himself, is only the result of 
one long line of development, where each generation has contributed its share 
in the building of the whole structure. 


The meaning and purpose of revolutions cannot be to tear down the 
whole building, but to take away what has not been well fitted into it or is 
unsuitable, and to fill in the gap thus caused, after which the main construction 
of the building will be carried on. 


Only thus will it be possible to talk of human progress, for otherwise the 
world would never be free of chaos, since each generation would feel entitled 
to reject the past, and to destroy all the work of the past, as the necessary 
preliminary to any new work of its own. 


The saddest feature of the condition in which our whole civilisation 
found itself before the War was the fact that 1t was not only barren of any 
creative force to produce its own works of art and civilisation but that it hated, 
defiled and tried to efface the memory of the superior works produced in the 
past. About the end of the last century people were less interested in producing 
new significant works of their own—particularly in the fields of dramatic art 
and literature—than in defaming the best works of the past and in presenting 
them as inferior and antiquated. 


As if this period of disgraceful decadence was capable of accomplishing 
anything! The efforts made to conceal the past from the eyes of the present 
afforded clear evidence of the fact that these apostles of the future acted from 
an evil intent. 


These symptoms should have made it clear to all that it was not a 
question of new, though wrong, cultural ideas, but of a process which was 
undermining the very foundations of civilisation. 


289 


It threw the artistic feeling which had hitherto been quite sane into utter 
confusion, thus spiritually preparing the way for political Bolshevism. If the 
creative spirit of the Periclean age be manifested in the Parthenon, then the 
Bolshevist era is manifested by a cubist mask. 


In this connection attention must be drawn once again to the want of 
courage displayed by one section of our people, namely, by those who, in 
virtue of their education and position, ought to have felt themselves obliged to 
take up a firm stand against this outrage against our culture, but they refrained 
from offering serious resistance and surrendered to what they considered the 
inevitable. 


This inaction of theirs was due, however, to sheer funk lest the apostles 
of Bolshevist art might raise a rumpus; for those apostles always violently 
attacked everyone who was not ready to recognise them as the choice spirits of 
artistic creation, and they tried to strangle all opposition by saying that it was 
the product of Philistine and backwater minds. 


People trembled in fear lest they might be accused by these yahoos and 
swindlers of lacking artistic appreciation, as if it would have been a disgrace 
not to be able to understand and appreciate the effusions of those mental 
degenerates or cunning rogues. 


Those cultural disciples, however, had a very simple way of presenting 
their own effusions as works of the highest quality. 


They offered incomprehensible and manifestly crazy productions to their 
amazed contemporaries as what they called ‘an inner experience.’ 


Thus they forestalled all adverse criticism, at very little cost indeed. Of 
course, nobody ever doubted that there could have been inner experiences like 
that; but some doubt ought to have arisen as to whether or not there was any 
justification for exhibiting these hallucinations of psychopaths or criminals to 
the sane portion of human society. 


The works produced by a Moritz von Schwind or a Bocklin were also 
the fruits of an inner experience, but these were the experiences of divinely 
gifted artists and not of buffoons. This situation afforded a good opportunity of 
studying the miserable cowardliness of our so-called intellectuals who shirked 
the duty of offering serious resistance to the poisoning of the sound instincts of 
our people. 


290 


They left it to the people themselves to formulate their own attitude 
towards this impudent nonsense. Lest they might be considered as 
understanding nothing of art, they accepted every caricature of art, until, they 
finally lost the power of judging what was really good or bad. 


Taken all in all, there were superabundant symptoms to show that a 
diseased epoch had begun. 


Still another critical symptom has to be considered. In the course of the 
nineteenth century our towns and cities began more and more to lose their 
character as centres of civilisation and became more and more centres of 
habitation. 


In our great modem cities the proletariat does not show much attachment 
to the place where it lives. This feeling results from the fact that their 
dwelling-place is nothing but an accidental abode, and is also partly due to the 
frequent change of residence which 1s forced upon them by social conditions. 


There is no time for the growth of any attachment to the town in which 
they live. Another reason lies in the cultural barrenness and superficiality of 
our modern cities. At the time of the German Wars of Liberation our German 
towns and cities were not only small in number, but also very modest in size. 


The few that could really be called great cities were mostly the 
residential cities of princes; as such they had almost always a definite cultural 
value and also a definite cultural aspect. 


Those few towns which had more than fifty thousand inhabitants were, in 
comparison with modern cities of the same size, rich in scientific and artist, 
treasures. At the time when Munich had a population of not more than sixty 
thousand souls it was already well on the way to becoming one of the first 
centres of German art. 


Nowadays, almost every industrial town has a population at least as 
large as that, without having anything of real value to call its own. They are 
agglomerations of tenement houses and congested dwelling-houses, and nothing 
else. 


It would be a miracle if anybody should grow sentimentally attached to 
such a meaningless place. Nobody can grow attached to a place which offers 
only just as much, or as little, as any other place would offer, which, has no 
character of its own and where obviously pains have been taken to avoid 


291 


everything that might have any resemblance to an artistic appearance. 


But this is not all. Even the great cities become more barren of real 
works of art the more they increase in population. They assume more and more 
a neutral atmosphere and present the same aspect, though on a larger scale, as 
the wretched little factory towns. 


Everything that our modern age has contributed to the cultural aspect of 
our great cities is absolutely deficient. All our towns are living on the glory 
and the treasures of the past. 


If we take away from the Munich of to-day everything that was created 
under Ludwig I, we should be horror-stricken to see how meagre has been the 
output of important artistic creations since that time. 


One might say much the same of Berlin and most of our other great 
towns. 


The following is the essential thing to be noticed. Our great modern 
cities have no outstanding monuments that dominate the general aspect of the 
city and could be pointed to as the symbols of a whole epoch, yet almost every 
ancient town had a monument erected to its glory. 


It was not in private dwellings that the characteristic art of ancient cities 
was displayed, but in the public monuments which were not meant to have a 
transitory interest but an enduring one. 


This was because they did not represent the wealth of some individual 
citizen but the greatness and importance of the community. 


It was under this inspiration that those monuments arose which bound the 
individual inhabitants to their own town in a manner that is often almost 
incomprehensible to us to-day. 


What struck the eye of the individual citizen was not a number of 
mediocre private buildings, but imposing structures that belonged to the whole 
community. 


In contradistinction to these, private dwellings were of only very 
secondary importance indeed. 


When we compare the size of those ancient public buildings with that of 
the private dwellings belonging to the same epoch, then we can understand the 


292 


great importance which was attached to the principle that those works which 
reflected and affected the life of the community should take precedence of all 
others. 


Among the broken arches and vast spaces that are covered with ruins 
from the ancient world the colossal monuments which still arouse our wonder 
have not been left to us from the commercial palaces of those days but from the 
temples of the gods and the public edifices that belonged to the State. 


The community itself was the owner of those great edifices. Even in the 
pomp of Rome during the decadence it was not the villas and palaces of the 
citizens that occupied the most prominent place, but rather the temples and the 
baths, the stadia, the circuses, the aqueducts, the basilicas, etc., which 
belonged to the State and therefore to the people as a whole. 


In medieval Germany also, the same principle held good, although the 
artistic outlook was quite different. In ancient times the theme that found its 
expression in the Acropolis or the Pantheon was now clothed in the form of the 
Gothic Cathedral. 


In the medieval cities these monumental structures towered gigantically 
above the swarm of smaller buildings, with their framework walls of wood 
and brick, and they remain the dominant feature of these cities even to our own 
day, although they are becoming more and more obscured by the tenement 
houses. 


They determine the character and appearance of the locality. Cathedrals, 
city halls, corn-exchanges, forts, are the outward expression of an idea which 
has its counterpart only in the ancient world. 


The dimensions and quality of our public buildings to-day are in 
deplorable contrast to the edifices that, represent private interests. 


If a similar fate should befall Berlin as befell Rome, future generations 
might gaze upon the ruins of some Jewish department stores or joint-stock 
hotels and think that these were the characteristic expressions of the culture of 
our time. 


In Berlin itself, compare the shameful disproportion between the 
buildings which belong to the Reich and those which have been erected for the 
accommodation of trade and finance. 


293 


The funds that are voted for public buildings are in most cases 
inadequate and really ridiculous. They are not built as structures that were 
meant to last, but mostly for the purpose of answering the need of the moment. 


No higher idea influenced those who commissioned such buildings. 


At the time the Berlin Schloss was built, it had quite a different 
significance to that which the new library has for our time, seeing that one 
battleship alone represents an expenditure of about sixty million marks, 
whereas less than half that sum was allotted for the building of the Reichstag, 
the most imposing structure erected for the Reich, which should have been 
built to last for ages. 


Yet, in deciding the question of internal decoration, the august House 
voted against the use of stone and ordered that the walls should be covered 
with stucco. 


For once, however, the parliamentarians made an appropriate decision 
on that occasion, for wooden heads would be out of place between stone 
walls. 


The community as such is not the dominant characteristic of our 
contemporary cities, and therefore it is not to be wondered at if the community 
does not find itself architecturally represented. Thus we must eventually arrive 
at a veritable civic desert which will finally be reflected in the total 
indifference of the individual citizen towards his own city. 


This is also a sign of our cultural decay and general break-up. 


Our era is entirely preoccupied with petty materialistic considerations, 
or rather it is entirely preoccupied with the question of money. 


Therefore, it is not to be wondered at if, with the worship of such an 
idol, the sense of heroism should entirely disappear, but the present is only 
reaping what the past had sown. 


All these symptoms which preceded the final collapse of the Second 
Reich must be attributed to the lack of a definite and uniformly accepted 
Weltanschauung and the general uncertainty of outlook consequent on that lack. 


This uncertainty showed itself when the great questions of the time had to 
be considered one after another and a decisive policy adopted towards them. 


294 


This lack is also .accountable for the habit of doing everything by halves, 
beginning with the educational system, the shilly-shallying, the reluctance to 
undertake responsibility and, finally, the cowardly tolerance of evils that were 
even admitted to be destructive. 


Visionary humanitarianism became the fashion. By weakly submitting to 
these aberrations and sparing the feelings of the individual, the future of 
millions of human beings was sacrificed. 


An examination of the religious situation before the War shows that the 
general process of disruption had extended to this sphere also. A great part of 
the nation itself had, for a long time past, ceased to have any convictions of a 
uniform and practical character in their ideological outlook on life. 


In this matter the point of primary importance was by no means the 
number of people who renounced their church membership, but rather the 
widespread indifference. 


While the two Christian denominations maintained missions in Asia and 
Africa, for the purpose of securing new adherents to the faith, these same 
denominations were losing millions and millions of their adherents at home in 
Europe. 


These former adherents either gave up religion wholly as a directive 
force in their lives, or they adopted their own interpretation of it. 


The consequences of this were specially felt in the moral life of the 
country. In parenthesis it may be remarked that the progress made by the 
missions in spreading the Christian faith abroad was very modest in 
comparison with the spread of Mohammedanism. 


It must be noted, too, that the attack on the dogmatic principles 
underlying ecclesiastical teaching increased steadily in violence, and yet this 
human world of ours would be inconceivable without the practical existence of 
a religious belief. 


The great masses of a nation are not composed of philosophers. For the 
masses of the people especially, faith is absolutely the only basis of a moral 
Weltanschauung. The various substitutes that have been offered have not 
shown any results that might warrant us in thinking that they might usefully 
replace the existing denominations, but if religious teaching and religious faith 
are to be accepted by the broad masses as active forces in their lives, then the 


295 


absolute authority of the doctrines of faith must be the foundation of all reality. 


There may be a few hundreds of thousands of superior men who can live 
wisely and intelligently without depending on the general standards that 
prevail in everyday life, but the millions of others cannot do so. 


Now, the place which general custom fills in everyday life, corresponds 
to that of general laws in the State and dogma in religion. 


The purely spiritual idea is of itself a changeable thing that may be 
subjected to endless interpretations. It is only through dogma that it is givena 
precise and concrete form without which it could not become a living faith. 


Otherwise, the spiritual idea would never become anything more than a 
mere metaphysical concept, or rather a philosophical opinion. 


Accordingly, the attack on dogma is comparable to an attack on the 
general laws on which the State is founded, and so this attack would finally 
lead to complete political anarchy if it were successful, just as the attack on 
religion would lead to a worthless religious nihilism. 


The political leader should not estimate the worth of a religion by taking 
some of its shortcomings into account, but should ask himself whether there be 
any practical substitute which is obviously better. Until such a substitute is 
available only fools and criminals would think of abolishing the existing 
religion. 


Undoubtedly, no small amount of blame for the present unsatisfactory 
religious situation must be attributed to those who have encumbered the ideal 
of religion with purely material accessories and have thus given rise to an 
utterly futile conflict between religion and science. 


In this conflict, victory will nearly always be on the side of science, 
although after a bitter struggle, while religion will suffer heavily in the eyes of 
those who cannot penetrate beneath mere superficial learning. 


The greatest damage of all has come from the practice of abusing 
religious conviction in order to further political aims. Most severe measures 
should be adopted against these miserable swindlers who look on religion 
merely as a means that can be exploited to serve political interests, or rather 
commercial ends. 


296 


The impudent and loud-mouthed liars who do this make their profession 
of faith before the whole world in stentorian tones so that all poor mortals may 
hear-not that they are ready to die for it if necessary, but rather that they may 
live all the better. 


They are ready to sell their faith for any political quid pro quo. For ten 
parliamentary mandates they would ally themselves with the Marxists, who are 
the mortal foes of all religion, and for a seat in the Cabinet they would go the 
length of wedlock with the devil, if the latter had not still retained some traces 
of decency which would lead him to refuse. If religious life in pre-war 
Germany had a disagreeable savour in the mouths of many people, this was 
because Christianity had been lowered to base uses by political parties that 
called themselves Christian and because of the shameful way in which they 
tried to identify the Catholic Faith with a political party. 


This substitution was fatal. It procured some worthless parliamentary 
mandates for the party in question, but the Church suffered damage thereby. 


The consequences of that situation had to be borne by the whole nation, 
for the laxity that resulted in religious life set in at a juncture when everything 
was beginning to lose stability and vacillate, and the traditional foundations of 
custom and of morality were threatening to fall asunder. 


Yet all those cracks and clefts in the social organism might not have been 
dangerous if no grave burdens had been laid upon it; but they became 
disastrous when the internal solidarity of the nation was the most important 
factor in withstanding the storm of big events. 


In the political field also, observant eyes might have noticed certain 
faults in the Reich which foretold disaster unless some alteration and 
correction took place in time. 


The lack of orientation in German policy, both domestic and foreign, was 
obvious to everyone who was not purposely blind. 


The best thing that could be said about the practice of making 
compromises is that it seemed outwardly to be in harmony with Bismarck’s 
saying that politics is the art of accomplishing the possible, but Bismarck was 
a slightly different man from the Chancellors who followed him. 


This difference allowed the former to apply that formula to the very 
essence of his policy, while in the mouths of the others it took on an utterly 


297 


different significance. 


When he uttered that phrase, Bismarck meant to say that in order to attain 
a definite political end all possible means should be employed, or at least that 
all possibilities should be investigated, but his successors saw in that phrase 
only a solemn declaration that one is not necessarily bound to have political 
principles or any definite political aims at all. 


The political leaders of the Reich at that time had no far-seeing policy. 
Here again, the necessary foundation was lacking, namely, a definite 
Weltanschauung, and those leaders also lacked that clear insight into the laws 
of political evolution which is a necessary quality in political leadership. 


Many people who took a gloomy view of things at that time condemned 
the lack of ideas and lack of orientation which were evident in directing the 
policy of the Reich. They recognised the inner weakness and futility of this 
policy, but such people played only a secondary role in politics. 


Those who had the government of the country in their hands were quite 
as indifferent to principles of civil wisdom laid down by thinkers like Houston 
Stewart Chamberlain as are our political leaders to-day. These people are too 
stupid to think for themselves, and they have too much self-conceit to take from 
others the instruction which they need. Oxenstierna gave expression to a truth 
which has lasted since time immemorial, when he said that the world is 
governed by only a particle of wisdom, and it can be said of practically every 
higher government official that he represents but a tiny atom of this particle. 


Since Germany became a Republic even this modicum is wanting, and 
that 1s why they had to promulgate the Law for the Defence of the Republic, 
which prohibits the holding of such views or the expression of them. 


It was fortunate for Oxenstierna that he lived at that time and not in this 
wise Republic of our day. Even before the war that institution which should 
have represented the strength of the Reich—the parliament, the Reichstag— 
was widely recognised as its weakest feature. Cowardliness and fear of 
shouldering responsibilities were associated together there to perfection. 


One of the silliest notions that one hears expressed to-day is that in 
Germany the parliamentary system has proved a failure since the Revolution. 


This might easily be taken to imply that the case was different before the 
Revolution, but in reality the parliamentary system can never function except to 


298 


the detriment of the country, and it functioned thus in those days when people 
saw nothing or did not wish to see anything. 


The German downfall is to be attributed in no small degree, to this 
system, but that the catastrophe did not take place sooner is not to the credit of 
the Reichstag, but rather to those who opposed the influence of this institution 
which, during peace time, was digging the grave of the German Nation and the 
German Reich. 


From the immense mass of devastating evils that were due either directly 
or indirectly to the Reichstag, I shall select the one most intimately typical of 
this institution which was the most irresponsible of all time. 


The evil I speak of was seen in the appalling shilly-shally and weakness 
in conducting the internal and external affairs of the Reich. It was attributable 
in the first place to the action of the Reichstag and was one of the principal 
causes of the political collapse. 


Everything subject to the influence of this parliament was done by 
halves, no matter from what aspect you may regard it. The foreign policy of the 
Reich in the matter of alliances was an example of shilly-shally. They wished 
to maintain peace, but in doing so, they steered straight for war. 


Their Polish policy was also carried out by half-measures. It acted as an 
irritant, but achieved no positive results. It resulted neither in a German 
triumph nor a Polish conciliation, and it made enemies of the Russians. 


They tried to solve the Alsace-Lorraine question through half-measures. 
Instead of crushing the head of the French hydra once and for all with the 
mailed fist and granting Alsace-Lorraine equal rights with the other German 
states, they did neither the one nor the other. 


Anyhow, it was impossible for them to do otherwise, for they had among 
their ranks the greatest traitors to the country, such as Herr Wetterlé of the 
Centre Party. 


But still the country might have been able to bear with all this provided 
the half-measure policy had not victimized that force on which, as the last 
resort, the existence of the Reich depended, namely, the Army. 


The crime committed by the so-called German Reichstag in this regard 
was sufficient of itself to draw down upon it the curses of the German nation 


299 


for all time. On the most miserable of pretexts these parliamentary party- 
henchmen filched from the hands of the nation and threw away, the weapons 
which were needed to maintain its existence and thereby defend the liberty and 
independence of our people. 


If the graves on the plains of Flanders were to open to-day the blood- 
stained accusers would arise, hundreds of thousands of our best German youth 
who, thanks to those conscienceless parliamentary criminals were delivered, 
badly trained or only half-trained, into the arms of Death. 


Those youths and other millions of the killed and mutilated were lost to 
the Fatherland simply and solely in order that a few hundred deceivers of the 
people might carry out their political manoeuvres and their exactions, or even 
continue to recite their doctrinaire theories. 


By means of the Marxist and democratic press, the Jews spread the 
colossal falsehood about ‘German militarism’ throughout the world and tried to 
inculpate Germany by every possible means, while at the same time the 
Marxist and democratic parties refused to assent to the measures that were 
necessary for the adequate training of our national defence forces. 


The appalling crime thus committed by these persons ought to have been 
obvious to everybody who foresaw that in case of war the whole nation would 
have to be called to arms and that, because of the mean huckstering of these 
noble ‘representatives of the people,’ as they called themselves, millions of 
Germans would have to face the enemy ill-equipped and insufficiently trained. 


But, even apart from the consequences of the crude and brutal lack of 
conscience which these parliamentarian rascals displayed, it was quite clear 
that the lack of properly trained soldiers at the beginning of a war would most 
probably lead to the loss of the said war; and this probability was confirmed in 
a most terrible way during the course of the World War. 


Therefore, the German people lost the struggle for the freedom and 
independence of their country because of the half-hearted and defective policy 
employed during times of peace in the organisation and training of the 
defensive strength of the nation. 


The number of recruits trained for the land forces was too small, but the 
same half-heartedness was shown in regard to the Navy and made this weapon 
of national self-preservation more or less ineffective. 


300 


Unfortunately, even the naval authorities themselves were contaminated 
with this spirit of half-heartedness. The tendency to build the ship on the stocks 
somewhat smaller than that just launched by the British showed little foresight 
and less genius. 


A fleet which cannot be brought to the same numerical strength as that of 
the probable enemy ought to compensate for this inferiority by the superior 
fighting power of the individual ship. 


It is the weight of the fighting power that counts and not any sort of 
traditional quality. As a matter of fact, modem technical development is so 
advanced and so well-proportioned among the various civilised States that it 
must be looked on as practically impossible for one Power to build vessels 
which would have a superior fighting quality to that of the vessels of equal size 
built by the other Powers. 


It is even less feasible to build vessels of smaller displacement which 
will be superior in action to those of larger displacement. As a matter of fact, 
the smaller proportions of the German vessels could be maintained only at the 
expense of speed and armament. The phrase used to justify this policy was in 
itself evidence of the lack of logical thinking on the part of the naval authorities 
who were in charge of these matters in times of peace. They declared that the 
German guns were definitely superior to the British, so that the German 28 cm. 
gun was just as effective as the British 30.5 cm. gun. 


But that was just why they should have adopted the policy of building 
30.5 cm. guns also; for it ought to have been their object not to achieve 
equality, but superiority, in fighting strength. 


If that were not so, then it would have been superfluous to equip the land 
forces with 42 cm. mortars, since the German 21 cm. mortar was far superior 
to any high-angle guns which the French possessed at that time and 
consequently the fortresses could probably have been taken by means of 30.5 
cm. mortars. 


The army authorities calculated correctly, the naval authorities 
unfortunately failed to do so. If they were willing to forego superiority of 
armaments as well as of speed, this was because of the fundamentally false 
‘principle of risk’ which they adopted. 


The naval authorities, even in times of peace, renounced the principle of 


301 


attack and thus had to follow a defensive policy from the very beginning of the 
war, but by this attitude they renounced also the chances of final success, 
which can be achieved only by taking the offensive. A vessel of slower speed 
and weaker armament will be crippled and battered by an adversary that is 
faster and stronger at a distance which gives the latter an advantage. 


A large number of cruisers have been through bitter experiences of this 
kind. How wrong the ideas prevalent among the naval authorities in times of 
peace were, was proved during the war. 


They were compelled to modify the armament of the old vessels and to 
equip the new ones with better armament whenever there was a chance to do 
SO. 


If the German vessels in the Battle of Jutland had been of equal size, the 
same armament and the same speed as the British, the British Fleet would have 
gone down under the tempest of German 38 cm. shells, which hit their mark 
more accurately and were more effective. 


Japan had followed a different kind of naval policy. There, as a matter of 
principle, care was taken to create with every single new vessel a fighting 
force that would be superior to that of the eventual adversaries, but because of 
this policy, it was afterwards possible to use the fleet for the offensive. 


While the army authorities refused to adopt such fundamentally 
erroneous principles, the Navy—which unfortunately had more representatives 
in parliament—succumbed to the spirit that ruled there. 


The Navy was not organised on a strong basis, and it was later used in 
an unsystematic and irresolute way. The immortal glory which the Navy won, 
in spite of these drawbacks, must be entirely credited to the good work, the 
efficiency and incomparable heroism of officers and crews. 


If its former commanders-in-chief had been, inspired with a like degree 
of genius, all the sacrifices would not have been in vain. 


It was probably the very parliamentarian skill displayed by the chief of 
the Navy during the years of peace which later became the cause of the fatal 
collapse, since parliamentarian considerations had begun to play a more 
important role in the construction of the Navy than fighting considerations. 


The irresolution, the weakness and the failure to adopt a logically 


302 


consistent policy, which is typical of the parliamentary system, contaminated 
the naval authorities. 


As I have already emphasised, the military authorities did not allow 
themselves to be led astray by such fundamentally erroneous ideas. 


Ludendorff, who was then a colonel on the General Staff, led a desperate 
struggle against the criminal vacillations with which the Reichstag treated the 
most vital problems of the nation, and in most cases voted against them. 


If the fight which this officer then waged remained unsuccessful, this 
must be ascribed to the parliament and partly also to the wretched and weak 
attitude of the Chancellor, Bethmann-Hollweg. 


Yet those who are responsible for Germany’s collapse do not hesitate 
now to lay the blame on the shoulders of the one man who took a firm stand 
against the neglectful manner in which the interests of the nation were 
managed, but one falsehood more or less makes no difference to these born 
tricksters. Anybody who thinks of all the sacrifices which this nation has had to 
bear, as a result of the criminal neglect of those irresponsible individuals; 
anybody who thinks of the number of those who died or were maimed 
unnecessarily; anybody who thinks of the deplorable shame and dishonour 
which has been heaped upon us and of the illimitable distress into which our 
people are now plunged—anybody who realises that all this had to happen in 
order to prepare the way to a seat in parliament for some unscrupulous 
placehunters and “pushers’, will understand that such hirelings can be called 
by no other name than that of rascal and criminal, for otherwise those words 
would have no meaning. 


In comparison with traitors who betrayed the nation’s trust, every other 
kind of twister may be looked upon as an honourable man. 


It was a peculiar feature of the situation that all the real faults of the old 
Germany were exposed to the public gaze only when the inner solidarity of the 
nation could be injured by doing so. Then indeed unpleasant truths were openly 
proclaimed in the ears of the broad masses, while many other things were at 
other times shamefully hushed up or their existence simply denied, especially 
at times when an open discussion of such problems might have led to an 
improvement. 


The higher government authorities knew little or nothing of the nature and 


303 


use of propaganda in such matters. Only the Jew knew that by an able and 
persistent use of propaganda, heaven itself can be presented to the people as if 
it were hell and, vice versa, the most miserable kind of life can be presented 
as if it were paradise. 


The Jew knew this and acted accordingly, but the German, or rather his 
government, did not have the slightest suspicion of it. 


During the war, the heaviest of penalties had to be paid for that 
ignorance. Over against the innumerable drawbacks which I have mentioned 
here and which affected German life before the war there were many 
outstanding features on the positive side. 


If we take an impartial survey, we must admit that most of our drawbacks 
were in great measure prevalent also in other countries and among the other 
nations, and very often in a worse form than with us, whereas among us there 
were many real advantages which the others did not have. 


Chief among Germany’s advantages was the fact that, of all the European 
nations, the German nation was almost the only one which had made a great 
effort to preserve the national character of its economic structure and for this 
reason was less subject than other countries to the power of international 
finance, though indeed there were many untoward symptoms in this regard 
also, and yet this advantage was a perilous one and turned out later to be one 
of the chief causes of the World War. Even if we disregard this advantage of 
national independence in economic matters, there were certain other positive 
features of our social and political life which were of outstanding excellence. 


These features were represented by three institutions which were 
constant sources of regeneration. In their respective spheres they were models 
of perfection and efficiency. 


The first of these was the constitution as such and the manner in which it 
had been developed in Germany in modern times. Of course we must except 
those monarchs who, as human beings, were subject to the failings which 
afflict this world and its children. 


If we were not so tolerant in these matters, then the case of the present 
generation would be hopeless, nor if we take into consideration the personal 
capabilities and character of the representative figures in our present regime, it 
would be difficult to imagine a more modest level of intelligence and moral 


304 


character. 


If we measure the ‘valise’ of the German Revolution by the personal 
worth and calibre of the individuals whom this revolution has presented to the 
German people since November 1918, then we may feel ashamed indeed in 
thinking of the judgment which posterity will pass on these individuals, when 
the Law for the Protection of the Republic can no longer silence public 
opinion. 


Coming generations will surely decide that the intelligence and integrity 
of our new German leaders were in inverse ratio to their boasting and their 
vices. 


It must be admitted that the monarchy had become alien in spirit to many 
citizens and especially to the broad masses. This resulted from the fact that the 
monarchs were not always surrounded by, let us say, the highest intellect and 
certainly not always by persons of the most upright character. 


Unfortunately, many of them preferred flatterers to honest-spoken men 
and hence received their ‘information’ from the former. This was a source of 
grave danger at a time when the world was passing through a period in which 
many of the old conditions were changing and when this change was affecting 
even the traditions of the Court. 


The average man or woman could not have felt any particular enthusiasm 
when, for example, at the close of the century, a princess in uniform and on 
horseback had the soldiers file past her on parade. 


Those high circles had apparently no idea of the impression which such 
a parade made on the minds of ordinary people, else such unfortunate 
occurrences would not have taken place. 


The sentimental humanitarianism—not always very sincere—which was 
professed in those high circles was often more repulsive than attractive. 


When, for instance, the Princess X condescended to taste the products of 
a soup-kitchen and found them excellent, as usual, such a gesture might have 
made an excellent impression in times long past, but on this occasion it had the 
opposite effect to that which was intended, for, even if we take it for granted 
that Her Highness did not have the slightest idea that, on the day she sampled 
it, the food was not quite the same as on other days, it sufficed that the people 
knew it. 


305 


Even the best of intentions thus became an object of ridicule or a cause 
of exasperation. 


Descriptions of the proverbial frugality practised by the monarch, his 
much too early rise in the morning and the drudgery he had to go through all 
day long until late at night, and especially the constantly expressed fears lest he 
might become undernourished—all this gave rise to ominous remarks on the 
part of the people. 


Nobody was keen to know what and how much the monarch ate or drank. 
Nobody grudged him a full meal, or the necessary amount of sleep. 


Everybody was pleased when the monarch, as a man and a personality, 
brought honour on his family and his country and fulfilled his duties as a 
sovereign. All the legends which were circulated about him helped little and 
did much damage. 


These and such things, however, are mere bagatelles: What was much 
worse was the feeling, which spread throughout large sections of the nation, 
that the affairs of the individual were being taken care of from above and that 
he did not need to bother himself with them. 


As long as the government was really good, or at least moved by 
goodwill, no serious objections could be raised, but the country was destined 
to disaster when the old government, which had at least striven for the best, 
was replaced by a new regime which was not of the same quality. 


Then the docile obedience and infantile credulity which formerly offered 
no resistance was bound to be one of the most fatal evils that can be imagined. 


In contrast to these and other defects there were, however, certain 
qualities which undoubtedly had a positive effect. 


First of all, the monarchical form of government guarantees stability in 
the direction of public affairs and safeguards public offices from the 
speculative turmoil of ambitious politicians. 


Furthermore, the venerable tradition which this institution possesses, 
arouses a feeling which gives it weight and authority. 


Beyond this there is the fact that the whole corps of officials, and the 
Army in particular, are raised above the level of political party obligations, 


306 


and still another positive feature was that the supreme rulership of the State 
was embodied in the monarch, as an individual person, who could serve as the 
symbol of responsibility which a monarch has to bear more seriously than any 
anonymous parliamentary majority. Indeed, the proverbial honesty and integrity 
of the German administration must be attributed chiefly to this fact. Finally, the 
monarchy fulfilled a high cultural function among the German people, which 
made amends for many of its defects. 


The German residential cities have remained, given in our time, centres 
of that artistic spirit which now threatens to disappear and is becoming more 
and more materialistic. 


The German princes gave a great deal of excellent and practical 
encouragement to art and science, especially during the nineteenth century. Our 
present age certainly has nothing of equal worth. 


During that process of disintegration which was slowly extending 
throughout the social order, the most positive factor was the Army. This was 
the strongest source of education which the German people possessed. 


For that reason all the hatred of our enemies was directed against this 
defender of our national self-preservation and our liberty. The strongest 
testimony in favour of this unique institution is the fact that it was derided, 
hated and fought against, but also feared, by worthless elements all round. 


The fact that the international profiteers who gathered at Versailles, 
further to exploit and plunder the nations, directed their enmity specially 
against the old German Army, proved once again that it deserved to be 
regarded as the institution which protected the liberties of our people against 
the forces of the International Stock Exchange. 


If the Army had not been there to sound—the alarm and stand on guard, 
the aims of the Versailles representatives would have been carried out much 
sooner. 


There is only one word to express what the German people owes to this 
Army—everything! 


It was the Army that still kept a sense of responsibility alive among the 
people when this quality had become very rare and when the, habit of shirking 
every kind of responsibility was steadily spreading. 


307 


This habit had grown up under the evil influences of parliament, which 
was itself the very model of irresponsibility. 


The Army trained the people to personal courage at a time when the 
virtue of timidity threatened to become an epidemic and when the spirit of 
sacrificing one’s personal interests for the good of the community was 
considered as something that amounted almost to weak-mindedness. 


At a time when only those were estimated as intelligent who knew how 
to safeguard and promote their own egotistic interests, the Army was the 
school through which individual Germans were taught not to seek the salvation 
of their nation in the false ideology of international fraternisation between 
Negroes, Germans, Chinese, French and English, etc., but in the strength and 
unity of their own national being. 


The Army developed the individual’s powers of resolute decision, and 
this at a time when a spirit of indecision and scepticism governed human 
conduct. At a time when the wiseacres were everywhere setting the fashion, it 
needed courage to uphold the principle that any command is better than none. 


This one principle represents a robust and sound style of thought, of 
which not a trace would have been left in the other branches of life if the Army 
had not furnished a constant source of this fundamental strength. 


A sufficient proof of this may be found in the appalling lack of decision 
which our present government authorities display. They cannot shake off their 
mental and moral lethargy and decide on some definite line of action, except 
when they are forced to sign some new dictate for the exploitation of the 
German people. 


In that case they decline all responsibility, while at the same time they 
sign everything which the other side places before them, and they sign with the 
readiness of an official stenographer. 


Their conduct is here explicable, on the ground, that, in this case, they 
are not under the necessity of coming to a decision, for the decision is dictated 
to them. 


The Army imbued its members with a spirit of idealism and developed 
their readiness to sacrifice themselves for their country and its honour, while 
greed and materialism dominated in all the other branches of life. 


308 


The Army united a people which was split up into classes, and in this 
respect had only one defect, which was the one-year term of voluntary military 
service, a privilege granted to those who had passed through the higher grade 
schools. 


It was a defect, because the principle of absolute equality was thereby 
violated, and those who had a better education were thus placed outside the 
cadres to which the rest of their comrades belonged. The reverse would have 
been better. 


Since our upper classes were really ignorant of what was going on in the 
body corporate of the nation and were becoming more and more estranged 
from the life of the people, the Army would have accomplished a very 
beneficial mission if it had refused to discriminate in favour of the so-called 
intellectuals, especially within its own ranks. 


It was a mistake that this was not done, but can we in this world of ours 
find any institution that has nit at least one defect? And in the Army, the good 
features were so absolutely predominant that the few defects it had, were far 
below the average that generally arises from human weakness. 


The greatest merit of the Army of the old Reich was that, at a time when 
the person of the individual counted for nothing and the majority was 
everything, it placed individual personal values above majority values. 


By insisting on its faith in personality, the Army opposed that typically 
Jewish and democratic apotheosis of the power of numbers. 


The Army trained what at that time was most sorely needed, namely, real 
men. During a period when men were falling prey to effeminacy and laxity, 
three hundred and fifty thousand vigorously trained young men went forth from 
the ranks of the Army each year. 


In the course of their two years training they had lost the softness of their 
young days and had developed bodies as tough as steel. The young man who 
had been taught obedience for two years was now fitted to command. The 
trained soldier could be recognised even by his walk. 


This was the great school of the German nation, and it was not without 
reason that it drew upon its head all the bitter hatred of those who wanted the 
Reich to be weak and defenceless, because they were jealous of its greatness 
and were themselves possessed by a spirit of rapacity and greed. 


309 


The rest of the world recognised a fact which many Germans did not 
wish to see, either because they were blind to facts or because, out of malice, 
they did not wish to see it. 


This fact was that the German Army was the most powerful weapon for 
the defence and freedom of the German nation and the best guarantee for the 
livelihood of its citizens. 


There was a third institution of positive worth, which has to be 
considered apart from the monarchy and the Army. This was the unrivalled 
civil service in the old Germany. 


German administration was better organised and better carried out than 
the administration of other countries. There may have been objections to the 
bureaucratic routine of the officials, but from this point of view, the state of 
affairs was similar, if not worse, 1n the other countries. 


The other States did not have the wonderful solidarity which this 
organisation possessed in Germany, nor were their civil servants of that same 
high level of scrupulous honesty. 


It is certainly better to be a trifle over-bureaucratic, honest and loyal 
than to be over-sophisticated, modem and of an inferior type of character and, 
as often happens today, ignorant and inefficient. 


If it be insinuated to-day that the German administration of the pre-war 
period may have been excellent so far as bureaucratic technique went, but that 
from the practical business point of view it was incompetent, I can only give 
the following reply: What other country in the world possessed a better- 
organised and administered business enterprise than the German State 
Railways, for instance? 


It was left to the Revolution to destroy this model organisation, until the 
time was ripe for it to be taken out of the hands of the nation and 
‘nationalised,’ in the sense which the founders of the Republic had given to 
that word, namely, making it subservient to the International Stock Exchange 
capitalists, who were the wire-pullers of the German Revolution. 


The most outstanding trait in the civil service and the whole body of the 
civil administration was its independence of the vicissitudes of government, 
the political mentality of which could exercise no influence on the attitude of 
the German State officials. 


310 


Since the Revolution, this situation has been completely changed. 
Efficiency and capability have been replaced by the test of party adherence; 
and independence of character and initiative are no longer appreciated as 
positive qualities in a public official. They rather tell against him. 


The wonderful might and power of the old Reich was based on the 
monarchical form of government, the Army and the civil service, of these three 
foundations rested that great strength which is now entirely lacking, namely, the 
authority of the State, for the authority of the State cannot be based on the 
babbling that goes on in parliament or in the provincial diets, upon laws made 
to protect the State, or upon sentences passed by the law courts to frighten 
those who have had the hardihood to deny the authority of the State, but only on 
the general confidence which the management and administration of the 
community establishes among the people. 


This confidence is, in its turn, nothing else than the result of an 
unshakable inner conviction that the government and administration of a 
country is inspired by disinterested and honest goodwill and of the feeling that 
the Spirit of the law is in complete harmony with the moral convictions of the 
people. 


In the long run, systems of government are not maintained by terrorism 
but by the belief of the people in the merits and sincerity of those who are there 
to administer and promote public interests. 


Though it is true that in the period preceding the war certain grave evils 
tended to infect and corrode the inner strength of the nation, it must be 
remembered that the other States suffered even more than Germany from these 
drawbacks, and yet those other States did not fail and break down when the 
time of crisis came. 


If we remember further that those defects in pre-war Germany were 
outweighed by great positive qualities, we shall have to look elsewhere for the 
real cause of the collapse, and it did lie elsewhere. 


The ultimate and most profound reason of the German downfall is to be 
found in the fact that the racial problem was ignored and that its importance in 
the historical development of nations was not grasped, for the events that take 
place in the life of nations are not due to chance but are the natural results of 
the effort to conserve and multiply, the species and the race, even though men 
may not be able consciously to picture in their minds the profound motives of 


311 


their conduct. 


312 


313 


314 


315 
